Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-436
Court-martial; records; reference.

The convening authority shall refer the record of each court-martial to his Staff Judge Advocate or legal officer, who shall submit his written opinion thereon to the convening authority. If the final action of the court has resulted in an acquittal of all charges and specifications, the opinion shall be limited to questions of jurisdiction and shall be forwarded with the record to the State Judge Advocate.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 36, p. 1569.